Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 15

General Provisions

Subchapter 1

— Arkansas Crop and Research Facility Protection Act

2-15-101. Arkansas Crop and Research Facilities Protection Act.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Crop and Research Facilities Protection Act”.

(1)Any person or entity who willfully and knowingly damages or destroys any field crop product that is grown for personal or commercial purposes or for testing or research purposes in the context of a product development program in conjunction or coordination with a private research facility or a university or any federal, state, or local government agency shall be liable for twice the value of the crop damaged or destroyed.

In awarding damages under this section, the courts shall consider:

The market value of the crop before damage or destruction; and

Production, research, testing, replacement, and crop development costs directly related to the crop that has been damaged or destroyed as part of the value of the crop.

Damages available under this section shall be limited to:

Twice the market value of the crop before damage or destruction; plus

Twice the actual damages involving production, research, testing, replacement, and crop development costs directly related to the crop that has been damaged or destroyed.

This section shall not apply to any persons or entities when performing construction, land improvements, or excavation work in or upon any public right-of-way, public easement, or utility easement or who in good faith believe they are in or upon the right-of-way or easement.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1025, §§ 1-3.

Subchapter 2

— Arkansas Rice Certification Act

2-15-201. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Rice Certification Act”.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1238, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 275, § 1, provided: “Acts 2005, No. 1238 § 2, which states ‘This act shall expire on July 1, 2009’, is hereby repealed.”

2-15-202. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Characteristics of commercial impact” means characteristics that may adversely affect the marketability of rice in the event of commingling with any other rice and includes, but is not limited to, those characteristics:

That cannot be identified without the aid of specialized equipment or testing;

That create a significant economic impact in their removal from commingled rice; and

Whose removal from commingled rice is not feasible; and

“Person” includes any individual, partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, corporation, firm, company, or any other entity doing business in Arkansas.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 275, § 1, provided: “Acts 2005, No. 1238 § 2, which states ‘This act shall expire on July 1, 2009’, is hereby repealed.”

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1238, § 1.

2-15-203. Prohibition of rice with characteristics of commercial impact.

No person may introduce, sell, plant, produce, harvest, transport, store, process, or otherwise handle rice identified as having characteristics of commercial impact, except in compliance with this subchapter and the rules adopted by the State Plant Board.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1238, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 275, § 1, provided: “Acts 2005, No. 1238 § 2, which states ‘This act shall expire on July 1, 2009’, is hereby repealed.”

2-15-204. Administration — Duties of the State Plant Board.

The State Plant Board shall:

Administer and enforce this subchapter;

Promulgate rules to implement the purposes and requirements of this subchapter, including rules that will establish a penalty matrix for violations of this subchapter and the rules promulgated under this subchapter; and

Receive and investigate complaints regarding alleged violations of this subchapter and rules promulgated by the board.

The board may:

Prohibit or place restrictions on the selling, planting, producing, harvesting, transporting, storing, processing, or other handling of rice identified as having characteristics of commercial impact; and

Charge a reasonable fee to cover the cost of inspections and other activities permitted under this subchapter.

All moneys received by the board under this subchapter and the rules adopted by the board shall be deposited into the Plant Board Fund to be used for carrying out the provisions of this subchapter.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 275, § 1, provided: “Acts 2005, No. 1238 § 2, which states ‘This act shall expire on July 1, 2009’, is hereby repealed.”

Cross References. Plant Board Fund, §19-6-408.

Identifying rice that has characteristics of commercial impact;

Reviewing rice identified as having characteristics of commercial impact upon receipt of a petition from the purveyor of the rice;

Recommending rules establishing terms and conditions for planting, producing, harvesting, selling, transporting, processing, storing, or otherwise handling rice identified under subdivision (b)(1) of this section; and

Reviewing the efficacy of terms, conditions, and identity preservation programs imposed on the planting, producing, harvesting, transporting, drying, storing, or other handling of rice identified under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, using the most current industry standards and generally accepted scientific principles.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 275, § 1, provided: “Acts 2005, No. 1238 § 2, which states ‘This act shall expire on July 1, 2009’, is hereby repealed.”

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 275, § 1, provided: “Acts 2005, No. 1238 § 2, which states ‘This act shall expire on July 1, 2009’, is hereby repealed.”

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1238, § 1.

2-15-205. Scientific Review Committee.

The State Plant Board may appoint a Scientific Review Committee.

The committee shall review and make recommendations to the board concerning all matters contained in this subchapter, including:

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1238, § 1.

2-15-206. Violations — Notice.

Upon receiving a complaint alleging that a person has violated this subchapter or a rule of the State Plant Board, the board shall provide notice to the person and an opportunity for the person to respond to the complaint.

If the board determines that the complaint warrants further action, the board shall notify the person in writing of the board's decision.

The board may seek injunctive relief, commence a civil action against the person, or seek other remedies provided by law.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1238, § 1.

2-15-207. Exemptions.

The provisions of this subchapter shall not apply to research conducted by a federal, state, or private entity, including an institution of higher education, which conforms to and is in compliance with all state and federal laws and rules for laboratory management practices.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1238, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 275, § 1, provided: “Acts 2005, No. 1238 § 2, which states ‘This act shall expire on July 1, 2009’, is hereby repealed.”

2-15-208. Penalties.

The State Plant Board may impose a civil penalty for violation of § 2-15-203.

The penalty shall not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

Each day of a continuing violation of § 2-15-203 is a separate violation.

The board may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction to collect a penalty under this section and may recover all attorney's fees, costs, and expenses incurred by the board in bringing the action.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 275, § 1, provided: “Acts 2005, No. 1238 § 2, which states ‘This act shall expire on July 1, 2009’, is hereby repealed.”

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1238, § 1.

Subchapter 3

— Grain, Soybean, and Peanut Owner's Lien Act

2-15-301. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Grain, Soybean, and Peanut Owner's Lien Act”.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1082, § 1.

2-15-302. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Affiliate” means a person that:

Is directly or indirectly controlled by a first purchaser; or

Directly or indirectly controls a first purchaser;

“Agreement to sell” means an enforceable oral or written agreement by which a grain, soybean, or peanut owner, either directly or through a sales agent, agrees to sell grain, soybeans, or peanuts to a first purchaser;

“Control” or “controlled by” means the direct or indirect possession of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person through ownership, by contract, or otherwise;

“First purchaser” means the first person that purchases grain, soybeans, or peanuts, either directly or indirectly through a sales agent, under an agreement to sell;

“Grain, soybean, or peanut owner” means a person owning an interest in grain, soybeans, or peanuts before the acquisition of the grain, soybeans, or peanuts by a first purchaser;

“Owner's lender” means a person that has a valid mortgage lien or security interest in a grain, soybean, or peanut owner's grain, soybeans, or peanuts at the time the grain, soybeans, or peanuts are delivered to the first purchaser;

“Owner's lien” means a lien granted under this subchapter;

“Permitted lien” means the following liens or security interests:

A mortgage lien or security interest granted by a first purchaser that:

Secures payment under a written instrument of indebtedness signed by the first purchaser and accepted in writing by the payee before July 22, 2015; and

Has a principal amount and a fixed maturity stated in the mortgage lien or security interest; and

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (8)(B)(iii).

Exists in and attaches immediately to all grain, soybeans, or peanuts on July 22, 2015; and

Continues uninterrupted and without lapse:

In all grain, soybeans, or peanuts upon and after the sale of the grain, soybeans, or peanuts; and

In and to all proceeds.

An owner's lien exists until the grain, soybean, or peanut owner or the sales agent entitled to receive the sales price has received the full amount of the sales price.

A security interest or mortgage lien of an owner's lender attaches to the grain, soybean, or peanut owner's right to an owner's lien in grain, soybeans, or peanuts or in proceeds from the sale of the grain, soybeans, or peanuts.

An owner's lender does not waive its security interest or mortgage lien or right in an owner's lien by approving or authorizing the grain, soybean, or peanut owner to sell the grain, soybeans, or peanuts under a sales agreement.

The validity of an owner's lien is not dependent on possession of the grain, soybeans, or peanuts by a grain, soybean, or peanut owner or sales agent.

An owner's lien is not void or expired by reason of a change or transfer of the actual or constructive possession of or title to the grain, soybeans, or peanuts from the grain, soybean, or peanut owner or sales agent to a first purchaser or subsequent purchaser.

A validly perfected and enforceable lien created by statute in relation to grain, soybeans, or peanuts purchased under an agreement to sell that secures payment of indebtedness incurred by the first purchaser before July 22, 2015.

“Permitted lien” does not include a mortgage lien or security interest that:

Secures payment under a written instrument of indebtedness that is modified, amended, or restated from or after July 22, 2015, by a modification, amendment, or restatement that increases the principal amount that is owed on July 22, 2015;

Secures payment under a written instrument of indebtedness that is modified, amended, or restated from or after July 22, 2015, by a modification, amendment, or restatement that extends the stated maturity of the written instrument of indebtedness that is in effect on July 22, 2015; or

Is not validly perfected with a first priority against the claims of all persons under applicable law other than a person holding a statutory or regulatory lien as to which first priority is granted by statute or rule;

“Person” means an individual or business entity, including without limitation an executor, administrator, estate, agent, trust, trustee, institution, receiver, business trust, firm, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, cooperative, joint venture, governmental entity or agency, association, and any other legal entity;

“Proceeds” means:

A right or amount paid or to be paid in consideration of or as a consequence of the sale of grain, soybeans, or peanuts, including without limitation cash proceeds, accounts, chattel paper, instruments, and payment intangibles;

A by-product from the processing of grain, soybeans, or peanuts; and

A right or amount paid or to be paid in consideration of or as a consequence of the sale of a by-product from the processing of grain, soybeans, or peanuts;

“Purchaser” means a person that:

Is not an affiliate of a first purchaser; and

Takes, receives, or purchases grain, soybeans, or peanuts from a first purchaser;

“Sales agent” means a person that is authorized to sell grain, soybeans, or peanuts on behalf of or for the benefit of another person; and

“Sales price” means the amount a first purchaser agrees to pay a grain, soybean, or peanut owner or a sales agent under an agreement to sell.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1082, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 7.

2-15-303. Grain, soybeans, or peanuts lien.

(1)To secure the obligations of a first purchaser to pay the sales price, a grain, soybean, or peanut owner is granted a lien in all grain, soybeans, or peanuts sold by the grain, soybean, or peanut owner for any unpaid portion of the sales price for the grain, soybeans, or peanuts.

The lien granted under this section is granted and shall exist as part of and incident to the ownership of grain, soybeans, or peanuts.

An owner's lien:

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1082, § 1.

2-15-304. Perfection of grain, soybean, or peanut lien.

An owner's lien is perfected automatically from July 22, 2015 or the date a sales agreement is executed after July 22, 2015 without the need to file a financing statement or other type of documentation.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1082, § 1.

2-15-305. Commingled grain, soybeans, or peanuts — Priority.

If grain, soybeans, or peanuts subject to an owner's lien are commingled with other grain, soybeans, or peanuts in a manner that the identity of the specific grain, soybeans, or peanuts subject to the owner's lien cannot be determined by reasonable means, the owner's lien continues without interruption into and attaches to the commingled grain, soybeans, or peanuts and is perfected automatically as of the date of its original perfection but only as to the percentage of the commingled grain, soybeans, or peanuts equal to the amount of grain, soybeans, or peanuts to which the owner's lien originally attached.

An owner's lien in commingled grain, soybeans, or peanuts under subsection (a) of this section has priority over any security interest or other lien that is not an owner's lien or permitted lien regardless of whether the security interest or other lien has been properly perfected.

If more than one (1) owner's lien attaches to commingled grain, soybeans, or peanuts, the owners' liens rank equally in the proportion that the respective sales prices secured by each owner's lien bear as a percentage of the total of the sales prices secured by all owners' liens applicable at the time the grain, soybeans, or peanuts were commingled.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1082, § 1.

2-15-306. Transfer of lien — Priority.

(1)A purchaser or sales agent takes free of an owner's lien otherwise applicable to the grain, soybeans, or peanuts purchased and is relieved of any obligations created under §2-15-303 if the purchaser or sales agent pays the full amount of required consideration for the grain, soybeans, or peanuts under a good faith, noncollusive agreement to purchase the grain, soybeans, or peanuts.

If a purchaser or sales agent pays the full amount of consideration under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the owner's lien transfers to the proceeds paid by the purchaser or sales agent.

An owner's lien shall continue uninterrupted in the proceeds paid to or otherwise due the first purchaser.

Except as specifically provided in this section, an owner's lien has priority over the rights of a purchaser or sales agent.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1082, § 1.

2-15-307. Lien priority generally.

Except for a permitted lien, an owner's lien takes priority over any other lien regardless of whether the lien arises by contract, law, equity, or otherwise.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1082, § 1.

2-15-308. Applicability.

This subchapter does not affect the time at which legal title to grain, soybeans, or peanuts may pass by agreement or operation of law subject to an owner's lien.

This subchapter does not apply to:

A farm-owned cooperative; or

An entity licensed under the:

United States Warehouse Act, 7 U.S.C. § 241 et seq.; or

Arkansas Public Grain Warehouse Law, § 2-17-201 et seq.

(1)A grain, soybean, or peanut owner shall not be required as a condition or term of an agreement to sell or otherwise to:

Waive, relinquish, or release an owner's lien or any rights under this subchapter other than upon payment in full of the sales price; or

Agree to a provision that would apply the law of a state other than the State of Arkansas with respect to the rights granted under this subchapter.

A waiver, relinquishment, release, or provision that violates subdivision (a)(1) of this section is void as a matter of the public policy of this state.

A grain, soybean, or peanut owner or a sales agent acting on behalf of a grain, soybean, or peanut owner may waive, relinquish, or release an owner's lien or any rights under this subchapter or agree to a provision that would apply the law of a state other than the State of Arkansas with respect to the rights granted under this subchapter if the first purchaser:

Executes a contract that is satisfactory to the grain, soybean, or peanut owner or sales agent to prepay or escrow the sales price under an agreement to sell that is satisfactory to the grain, soybean, or peanut owner; and

Performs all of the first purchaser's obligations under the contract.

An owner's lien expires one (1) year after the last day of the month following the date the sales price from the sale of grain, soybeans, or peanuts subject to the lien is required by law or contract to be paid to the grain, soybean, or peanut owner but only as to the particular grain, soybeans, or peanuts sold during the month unless an action to enforce the owner's lien is commenced in a court of competent jurisdiction during that time.

If a sales agent advances the sales price for grain, soybeans, or peanuts to the grain, soybean, or peanut owner before the first purchaser pays the sales price in full to the grain, soybean, or peanut owner or sales agent, the sales agent shall assume and may enforce all rights of the grain, soybean, or peanut owner under this subchapter as to the grain, soybeans, or peanuts or the proceeds from the sale of the grain, soybeans, or peanuts.

In addition to any other court of competent jurisdiction, an action to enforce an owner's lien may be commenced in the district court of the county in which the:

Agreement to sell is executed;

Sales price is to be paid;

The grain, soybeans, or peanuts that have not been paid for are located; or

Proceeds may be found.

The commencement of one (1) or more of the following proceedings by or against a person claiming an interest in property subject to an owner's lien tolls the one-year period in which to commence an action to enforce the owner's lien under subsection (a) of this section for an additional period of ninety (90) days from the earlier of the final conclusion or dismissal of the proceedings or the date final relief is obtained from the applicable tribunal authorizing the commencement of the action:

An action seeking to adjudicate the person as bankrupt or insolvent;

An action seeking liquidation, winding up, reorganization, arrangement, adjustment, protection, relief, or composition of the person or the person's debts under any law relating to bankruptcy, insolvency, or reorganization or relief of debtors; or

An action seeking the entry of an order for relief or the appointment of a receiver, trustee, or other similar official for the person or for a substantial part of the person's property.

The prevailing party in an action to enforce this subchapter may recover costs and reasonable attorney's fees in any legal proceeding.

This subchapter does not impair or affect the right of a grain, soybean, or peanut owner or a sales agent to maintain a personal action to recover the debt against a person liable for payment of the sales price or to exercise any other available rights and remedies.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1082, § 1.

2-15-309. Waiver, relinquishment, or release of lien prohibited.

Posts a letter of credit in a form and amount satisfactory to the grain, soybean, or peanut owner or sales agent; or

Both:

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1082, § 1.

2-15-310. Lien expiration — Action on an owner's lien.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1082, § 1.

2-15-311. Preference.

If this subchapter conflicts with other rights a grain, soybean, or peanut owner may have, the grain, soybean, or peanut owner's right to receive the sales price shall be given preference.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1082, § 1.

Subchapter 4

— Arkansas Industrial Hemp Act

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

2-15-401. Title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Industrial Hemp Act”.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 981, § 1.

Meaning of “this act”. Acts 2017, No. 981, codified as §§2-15-401 —2-15-412,19-6-301,19-6-835.

2-15-402. Legislative intent.

This subchapter is intended to assist the state in moving to the forefront of industrial hemp production, development, and commercialization of hemp products in agribusiness, alternative fuel production, and other business sectors, both nationally and globally, and to the greatest extent possible.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 981, § 1.

2-15-403. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Agribusiness” means the processing of raw agricultural products, including without limitation timber and industrial hemp, or the performance of value-added functions with regard to raw agricultural products;

“Certified seed” means industrial hemp seed that has been certified as having no more tetrahydrocannabinol concentration than that adopted by federal law under the Controlled Substances Act, 21 U.S.C. § 801 et seq.;

“Grower” means a person licensed to grow industrial hemp by the State Plant Board;

“Hemp product” means a product made from industrial hemp, including without limitation:

Certified seed for cultivation if the seeds originate from industrial hemp varieties;

Cloth;

Cordage;

Fiber;

Food;

Fuel;

Paint;

Paper;

Particleboard;

Plastics; and

Seed, seed meal, and seed oil for consumption;

“Industrial hemp” means all parts and varieties of the plant Cannabis sativa, cultivated or possessed by a licensed grower, whether growing or not, that contain a tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of no more than that adopted by federal law in the Controlled Substances Act, 21 U.S.C. § 801 et seq.;

“Seed research” means research conducted to develop or recreate better strains of industrial hemp, particularly for the purposes of seed production; and

“Tetrahydrocannabinol” means the natural or synthetic equivalents of the substances contained in the plant, or in the resinous extractives of, Cannabis sativa, or any synthetic substances, compounds, salts, or derivatives of the plant or chemicals and their isomers with similar chemical structure and pharmacological activity.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 981, § 1.

2-15-404. State Plant Board — Research program.

The State Plant Board may adopt rules to administer the industrial hemp research program and to license persons to grow industrial hemp under this subchapter.

The board may include as part of its rules the establishment of industrial hemp testing criteria and protocols.

The board shall promote research and development concerning industrial hemp and commercial markets for Arkansas industrial hemp and hemp products.

The board may work in conjunction with the Division of Agriculture of the University of Arkansas and the University of Arkansas Cooperative Extension Service regarding industrial hemp research programs.

The board may undertake research concerning industrial hemp production through the establishment and oversight of a ten-year industrial hemp research program.

In conjunction with the Division of Agriculture of the University of Arkansas, the board may create a program consisting primarily of demonstration plots planted and cultivated in this state by growers licensed under this subchapter.

The board may determine the location, and the total number and acreage, of each demonstration plot.

In conducting research under this subchapter, higher tetrahydrocannabinol concentration varieties of industrial hemp may be grown to provide breeding strains to revitalize the production of industrial hemp.

However, tetrahydrocannabinol levels shall not exceed three-tenths of one percent (0.3%).

The board may seek permits or waivers from the United States Drug Enforcement Administration or the appropriate federal agency that are necessary for the advancement of the industrial hemp research program.

In conjunction with the Division of Agriculture of the University of Arkansas, the board may:

Oversee and analyze the growth of industrial hemp by selected and licensed growers for agronomy research and analysis of required soils, growing conditions, and harvest methods relating to the production of industrial hemp that may be suitable for various commercial hemp products, including without limitation industrial hemp seed, paper, clothing, and oils;

Conduct seed research on various types of industrial hemp that are best suited to be grown in Arkansas, including without limitation:

Creation of Arkansas hybrid types of industrial hemp;

Industrial hemp seed availability; and

In-the-ground variety trials and seed production;

Establish a program to recognize certain industrial hemp seed as being Arkansas heritage hemp seed;

Study the economic feasibility of developing an industrial hemp market in various types of industrial hemp that can be grown in the state;

Report on the estimated value-added benefits, including environmental benefits, that Arkansas businesses could reap by having an industrial hemp market of Arkansas-grown industrial hemp varieties in the state;

Study the agronomy research being conducted worldwide relating to industrial hemp varieties, production, and utilization;

Research and promote Arkansas industrial hemp and hemp seed on the world market that can be grown on farms in the state; and

Study the feasibility of attracting federal and private funding for the Arkansas industrial hemp research program.

The board may:

Coordinate with the Arkansas Energy Office of the Division of Environmental Quality to study the use of industrial hemp in new energy technologies, including without limitation:

Evaluation of the use of industrial hemp to generate electricity, and to produce biofuels and other forms of energy resources;

Growth of industrial hemp on reclaimed mine sites;

Use of hemp seed oil in the production of fuels; and

Assessment of the production costs, environmental issues, and costs and benefits involved with the use of industrial hemp for energy; and

Promote awareness of the financial incentives that may be available to agribusiness and manufacturing companies that manufacture industrial hemp into hemp products to:

Attract new businesses to the state;

Create a commercial market for industrial hemp;

Create new job opportunities for Arkansas residents; and

Diversify the agricultural economy of the state.

The research activities under this subchapter shall not:

Subject the industrial hemp research program to criminal liability under the controlled substances laws of the state.

The exemption from criminal liability under subdivision (b)(7)(A)(i) of this section is a limited exemption that shall be strictly construed and that shall not apply to an activity of the industrial hemp research program that is not expressly permitted under this subchapter; or

Amend or repeal by implication a provision of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, § 5-64-101 et seq.

The board shall notify the Division of Arkansas State Police and each local law enforcement agency with jurisdiction of the duration, size, and location of all industrial hemp demonstration plots.

The board may cooperatively seek funds from both public and private sources to implement the industrial hemp research program created in this subchapter.

By December 31, 2018, and annually thereafter, the board shall report on the status and progress of the industrial hemp research program to the Governor and to the Department of Agriculture.

The board may establish and collect fees to administer the industrial hemp research program.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 140 added (b)(11).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language of (b)(6)(A); substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (b)(8); and substituted “Department of Agriculture” for “Arkansas Agriculture Department” in (b)(10).

The development of industrial hemp production in the state; and

The commercialization of hemp products in agribusiness, alternative fuel production, and other business sectors, to the greatest extent possible.

The commission may promote the availability of financial incentives offered by state government for the processing and manufacture of industrial hemp into hemp products in the state, including without limitation incentives offered to interested parties both within and without this state.

Administrative expenses under this section shall be paid from the Arkansas Industrial Hemp Program Fund.

Cross References. Arkansas Industrial Hemp Program Fund, §19-6-835.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 981, § 1; 2019, No. 140, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2412-2414.

2-15-405. Interagency cooperation.

The Division of Agriculture of the University of Arkansas may provide research and development related services under this subchapter for the State Plant Board, including without limitation:

Testing of industrial hemp;

Processing of documents relating to the program of licensure;

Financial accounting and recordkeeping, and other budgetary functions; and

Meeting coordination and staffing.

(1)The Arkansas Economic Development Commission may work in conjunction with the board to promote:

History.

Acts 2017, No. 981, § 1.

2-15-406. State Plant Board — Reports.

The State Plant Board may report to the Department of Agriculture concerning industrial hemp policies and practices that may result in the proper legal growing, management, use, and marketing of the state's potential industrial hemp industry, including without limitation:

Federal laws and regulatory constraints;

The economic and financial feasibility of an industrial hemp market in Arkansas;

Arkansas businesses that might use industrial hemp;

Examination of research on industrial hemp production and use;

The potential for globally marketing Arkansas industrial hemp;

A feasibility study of private funding for the Arkansas industrial hemp research program;

Enforcement concerns;

Statutory and regulatory schemes for growing of industrial hemp by private producers; and

Technical support and education about industrial hemp.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Agriculture” for “Governor and to the Arkansas Agriculture Department” following “may report to the” in the introductory language.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 981, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 17.